Maine, session 132, LD1401.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1605, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2023, c. 395, Pt. A,
§1, is further amended to read:
C. Be in the amount or limit of at least:
(1) For damage to property, $25,000;
(2) For injury to or death of any one person, $50,000;
(3) For one accident resulting in injury to or death of more than one person,
$100,000; and
(4) For medical payments pursuant to section 1605‑A, $2,000; and.
(5) For towing and storage charges pursuant to section 1605‑B, $500.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1605-B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 395, Pt. A, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1861, first ¶, as amended by PL 2023, c. 395, Pt. A, §3, is
further amended to read:
A person holding or storing an abandoned vehicle, holding or storing a vehicle towed
at the request of the vehicle's operator, owner or owner's agent or holding or storing a
vehicle stored at the request of a law enforcement officer may hold the vehicle and all its
accessories, contents and equipment, not including the personal effects of the registered
owner, until reasonable towing and storage charges of the person holding or storing the
vehicle are paid, except that a person may not hold the perishable cargo of a commercial
motor vehicle, as defined in 49 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 390.5, as amended, when
the perishable cargo being transported in interstate or intrastate commerce is not owned by
the motor carrier or driver of the commercial motor vehicle being held and the person
holding or storing the towed vehicle is presented with evidence of insurance, as defined in
section 1551, covering the commercial motor vehicle and the vehicle's cargo. For purposes
of this paragraph, "perishable cargo" means cargo of a commercial motor vehicle that is
subject to spoilage or decay or is marked with an expiration date. The owner of the vehicle
shall maintain, at a minimum, the amounts of motor vehicle financial responsibility in
accordance with section 1605‑B to pay the reasonable towing and storage charges of the
person holding or storing the vehicle.